West Virginia, session 2026, SB768.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2F. the country roads mapping and marketing act. §17-2F-1. Short Title. This act shall be known as the "West Virginia Country Roads Mapping and Marketing Act". §17-2F-1a. Definitions. As used in this article:"Division" means the West Virginia Division of Highways. §17-2F-2. Legislative findings. (a) West Virginia’s back roads are a valuable asset for tourism, economic development, and local businesses.(b) Counties should have a tool to promote scenic and recreational travel routes while ensuring accurate and accessible mapping.(c) Providing an interactive mapping system will benefit both local residents and visitors by improving navigation and awareness of unique travel opportunities. §17-2F-3. County application process. (a) Counties may apply to the Division for an exhaustive mapping process of their back roads and secondary routes.(b) The Division shall develop a standardized application process for counties to request mapping services.(c) Approved counties shall have their roads digitally mapped, with routes identified for scenic, historic, and recreational value. §17-2F-4. Road surface classification. (a) The Division shall classify all mapped roads according to existing division standards, including but not limited to:(1) Paved (Asphalt or Concrete);(2) Gravel or Aggregate; and(3) Dirt/Unimproved.(b) In addition to existing classifications, the division shall designate roads that require high-clearance, four-wheel-drive (4x4) vehicles due to rough terrain, stream crossings, or steep grades.(c) The interactive map and app shall clearly display surface classifications and 4x4-only designations to assist travelers in route selection. §17-2F-5. Interactive mapping and public input. (a) The division shall create an interactive, publicly accessible map of approved counties.(b) The map shall be editable by the public to allow for notes, route recommendations, points of interest, and road condition updates, subject to moderation by the county commission.(c) Data from the mapping project shall be integrated into a Geographic Information System (GIS) compatible format and made available to counties. §17-2F-6. Application development. (a) The division shall work with technology partners to develop a mobile application that allows users to navigate mapped routes and view user-added notes.(b) The app shall serve as a marketing tool for counties to promote tourism, travel, and outdoor recreation on back roads. §17-2F-7. Funding and implementation. (a) The division shall issue a request for proposals (RFP) to develop the mapping technology and app infrastructure.(b) Funding for this program shall be provided through the division tourism and infrastructure budget, with potential for grant partnerships. §17-2F-8. Reporting and review. (a) The division shall submit an annual report to the Legislature detailing county participation, app usage, and the program’s impact on tourism.(b) Counties may provide feedback and request updates or modifications to the mapping system. §17-2F-9. Effective date. This act shall take effect immediately on passage.